Nebraska, session 109, LB765.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB765 LB765
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 10-702, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
10-702 (1)(a) The question of issuing school district bonds may be
submitted at a special election or such question may be voted on at an
election held in conjunction with the statewide primary or statewide
general election. No bonds shall be issued until:
(i) The the question has been submitted to the qualified electors of
the district;
(ii) The question has been voted upon by at least fifty and one-
tenth percent of the qualified electors of the district; and
(iii) A a majority of all the qualified electors voting on the
question have voted in favor of issuing the same, at an election called
for the purpose, upon notice given by the officers of the district at
least twenty days prior to such election.
(b) If the election for issuing bonds is held as a special election,
the procedures provided in section 10-703.01 shall be followed.
(c) The question of bond issues in such districts, when defeated,
shall not, except in case of fire or other disaster or in the case of a
newly created district, be resubmitted in substance for a period of six
months from and after the date of such election.
(2) When the question of issuing bonds is to be submitted at a
statewide primary or statewide general election as ordered by a
resolution of a majority of the members of the board of education, such
order shall be made in writing and filed with the county clerk or
election commissioner by March 1 for the statewide primary election or
September 1 for the statewide general election. The order calling for the
school bond election shall be filed with the county clerk or election
commissioner in the county having the greatest number of electors
entitled to vote on the question. The county clerk or election
commissioner receiving such order shall conduct the school bond election
for the school district as provided in the Election Act.
-2-

LB765 LB765
2026 2026
(3) A special notice of the election shall be published by the board
of education in a newspaper or newspapers of general circulation within
the district stating the day of the election, the hours during which the
polls will be open, and any other information deemed necessary in
informing the public of the bond issue. The notice shall be made at least
twenty days prior to the election.
(4) If the question of submitting bonds for the school district is
voted upon in one or more counties and the ballots have been certified
across county lines, the election boards in the counties where the
ballots are cast shall count the ballots on election day the same as all
other ballots are counted and seal the same in their ballots-cast
container along with other ballots.
(5) The canvassing boards in each county shall canvass the returns
in the same manner as other returns are canvassed.
(6) The county clerk or election commissioner in any adjoining
county voting on the bond issue shall certify the returns to the county
clerk or election commissioner of the county having the greatest number
of electors entitled to vote on the question of issuing bonds.
(7) The county clerk or election commissioner in such county shall
enter the total returns from any adjoining county or counties to the
total votes recorded in his or her official book of votes cast and shall
certify the returns to the board of education for which such bond
election was held.
(8) Public funds, including building funds, cash funds, and
discretionary funds, shall not be used in any way to establish, conduct,
underwrite, promote, subsidize, or in any other way support or advocate
for, any campaign meant to influence potential voters in a school
district bond election. Funds donated or raised privately, including from
sources such as concession sales, booster clubs, and parent-teacher
organizations are not considered public funds for purposes of this
subsection and are not subject to such prohibition.
-3-

LB765 LB765
2026 2026
(9) No employee of any school district or educational service unit
shall devote any paid work time to establish, conduct, underwrite,
promote, subsidize, or in any other way support or advocate for, any
campaign meant to influence potential voters in a school district bond
election. Such employees may provide general information to patrons
regarding a school district bond issue, such as subject matter, the
amount of the bond, and the date of the election.
(10) Campaign materials, including, but not limited to, fliers,
literature, signage, or apparel supporting or advocating for a proposed
school district bond shall not be distributed or posted in or on any
facility, grounds, or mode of conveyance connected to or associated with
any school district or educational service unit properties. Informational
materials that do not advocate for a proposed school district bond but
simply provide generic information about such bond are allowed.
Sec. 2. Section 13-809, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
13-809 (1) Subject to subsections (2), and (3), and (4) of this
section, any joint entity may from time to time issue its bonds in such
principal amounts as its governing body shall deem necessary to provide
sufficient funds to carry out any of the joint entity's purposes and
powers, including the establishment or increase of reserves, the payment
of interest accrued during construction of a project and for such period
thereafter as the governing body may determine, and the payment of all
other costs or expenses of the joint entity incident to and necessary or
convenient to carry out its purposes and powers.
(2) Bonds issued on or after April 18, 2018, for purposes of the
Public Facilities Construction and Finance Act shall be subject to a vote
prior to issuance as provided in such act.
(3)(a) For any joint entity created on or after February 14, 2024,
that includes a Nebraska school district or an educational service unit,
such joint entity shall not issue any bonds until:
-4-

LB765 LB765
2026 2026
(i) The the question of issuing such bonds has been submitted to the
qualified electors of each Nebraska school district or educational
service unit that is part of the joint entity at an election called for
that purpose as provided in this section;
(ii) The question has been voted upon by at least fifty and one-
tenth percent of the qualified electors of the school district or
educational service unit that is part of the joint entity; and
(iii) Within , within each such school district or educational
service unit, a majority of the qualified electors voting on the question
voted in favor of issuing the bonds.
(b) The joint entity shall give notice of the election at least
fifty days prior to the election. The question of issuing bonds may be
submitted at the statewide primary or general election. The election
shall be conducted in accordance with the Election Act.
(c) The question of bond issues, when defeated, shall not be
resubmitted in substance for a period of at least six months after the
date of such election.
(4)(a) Public funds, including building funds, cash funds, and
discretionary funds, shall not be used in any way to establish, conduct,
underwrite, promote, subsidize, or in any other way support or advocate
for, any campaign meant to influence potential voters in a bond election
for a joint entity which includes a school district or educational
service unit. Funds donated or raised privately, including from sources
such as concession sales, booster clubs, and parent-teacher organizations
are not considered public funds for purposes of this subsection and are
not subject to such prohibition.
(b) No employee of any school district or educational service unit
shall devote any paid work time to establish, conduct, underwrite,
promote, subsidize, or in any other way support or advocate for, any
campaign meant to influence potential voters in a bond election for a
joint entity that includes a school district or educational service unit.
-5-

LB765 LB765
2026 2026
Such employees may provide general information to patrons regarding a
bond issue, such as subject matter, the amount of the bond, and the date
of the election.
(c) Campaign materials, including, but not limited to, fliers,
literature, signage, or apparel supporting or advocating for a proposed
bond to be issued by a joint entity that includes a school district or
educational service unit shall not be distributed or posted in or on any
facility, grounds, or mode of conveyance connected to or associated with
any school district or educational service unit properties. Informational
materials that do not advocate for a proposed bond but simply provide
generic information about such bond are allowed.
Sec. 3. Original section 10-702, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 13-809, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-6-